apertium-en-ca/partofspeech/apertium_vb.ca.dix
    <pardef n="abarat/ir__vblex">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iríem</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iria</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iríeu</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iries</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irien</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iria</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irem</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iré</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ireu</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iràs</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iran</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irà</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
     
     
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>int</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
     <e>
        <p>
          <l>int</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__anant"/>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>írem</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>í</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>íreu</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ires</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>iren</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>í</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>im</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>iguem</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
     <e>
        <p>
          <l>im</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__aneu"/>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>iguem</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__aneu"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iu</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
     <e>
        <p>
          <l>iu</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__aneu"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eix</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ix</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
     <e>
        <p>
          <l>eix</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__aclareix"/>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ix</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__aclareix"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eixin</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>esquen</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>isquen</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
     <e>
        <p>
          <l>eixin</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__anant"/>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>esquen</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__anant"/>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>isquen</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__anant"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eixi</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>esca</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>esqui</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>isca</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
     <e>
        <p>
          <l>eixi</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__vagi"/>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>esca</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__vagi"/>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>esqui</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__vagi"/>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>isca</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__vagi"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ir</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
     <e>
        <p>
          <l>ir</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__anant"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>íem</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ia</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>íeu</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ies</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ien</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ia</l>
          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>

<e lm="assumir"><i>assum</i><par n="abarat/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="compartir"><i>compart</i><par n="abarat/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="decidir"><i>decid</i><par n="abarat/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dirigir"><i>dirig</i><par n="abarat/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="discutir"><i>discut</i><par n="abarat/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="existir"><i>exist</i><par n="abarat/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="garantir"><i>garant</i><par n="abarat/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="llegir"><i>lleg</i><par n="abarat/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="patir"><i>pat</i><par n="abarat/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="referir"><i>refer</i><par n="abarat/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="reflectir"><i>reflect</i><par n="abarat/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="requerir"><i>requer</i><par n="abarat/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="seguir"><i>segu</i><par n="abarat/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="suggerir"><i>sugger</i><par n="abarat/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="unir"><i>un</i><par n="abarat/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="gaudir de"><i>gaud</i><par n="abarat/ir__vblex"/>	<p>	  <l><b/>de</l>	  <r><g><b/>de</g></r>	</p></e>
<e lm="absorbir"><i>absorb</i><par n="abarat/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="afavorir"><i>afavor</i><par n="abarat/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="aprofundir"><i>aprofund</i><par n="abarat/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="avergonyir"><i>avergony</i><par n="abarat/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="conferir"><i>confer</i><par n="abarat/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="consumir"><i>consum</i><par n="abarat/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="deprimir"><i>deprim</i><par n="abarat/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dirigir"><i>dirig</i><par n="abarat/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="distingir"><i>disting</i><par n="abarat/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dividir"><i>divid</i><par n="abarat/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="endurir"><i>endur</i><par n="abarat/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="enfosquir"><i>enfosqu</i><par n="abarat/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="envellir"><i>envell</i><par n="abarat/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="exercir"><i>exerc</i><par n="abarat/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="expandir"><i>expand</i><par n="abarat/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="inhibir"><i>inhib</i><par n="abarat/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="nodrir"><i>nodr</i><par n="abarat/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="preferir"><i>prefer</i><par n="abarat/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="prohibir"><i>prohib</i><par n="abarat/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="rellegir"><i>relleg</i><par n="abarat/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="resistir"><i>resist</i><par n="abarat/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="restringir"><i>restring</i><par n="abarat/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sorgir"><i>sorg</i><par n="abarat/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="suprimir"><i>suprim</i><par n="abarat/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tenyir"><i>teny</i><par n="abarat/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="embotir"><i>embot</i><par n="abarat/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ferir"><i>fer</i><par n="abarat/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="repetir"><i>repet</i><par n="abarat/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="abolir"><i>abol</i><par n="abarat/ir__vblex" /></e>
<e lm="alentir"><i>alent</i><par n="abarat/ir__vblex" /></e>
<e lm="aterrir"><i>aterr</i><par n="abarat/ir__vblex" /></e>
<e lm="col·lidir"><i>col·lid</i><par n="abarat/ir__vblex" /></e>
<e lm="conquerir"><i>conquer</i><par n="abarat/ir__vblex" /></e>
<e lm="descomprimir"><i>descomprim</i><par n="abarat/ir__vblex" /></e>
<e lm="dissentir"><i>dissent</i><par n="abarat/ir__vblex" /></e>
<e lm="emergir"><i>emerg</i><par n="abarat/ir__vblex" /></e>
<e lm="enfurir"><i>enfur</i><par n="abarat/ir__vblex" /></e>
<e lm="entristir"><i>entrist</i><par n="abarat/ir__vblex" /></e>
<e lm="estergir"><i>esterg</i><par n="abarat/ir__vblex" /></e>
<e lm="flectir"><i>flect</i><par n="abarat/ir__vblex" /></e>
<e lm="inferir"><i>infer</i><par n="abarat/ir__vblex" /></e>
<e lm="mugir"><i>mug</i><par n="abarat/ir__vblex" /></e>
<e lm="obscurir"><i>obscur</i><par n="abarat/ir__vblex" /></e>
<e lm="redefinir"><i>redefin</i><par n="abarat/ir__vblex" /></e>
<e lm="redirigir"><i>redirig</i><par n="abarat/ir__vblex" /></e>
<e lm="rejovenir"><i>rejoven</i><par n="abarat/ir__vblex" /></e>
<e lm="resplendir"><i>resplend</i><par n="abarat/ir__vblex" /></e>
<e lm="transgredir"><i>transgred</i><par n="abarat/ir__vblex" /></e>
